New Jersey, session 222, S3393.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    As used in P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill): Food delivery company means any company providing food ordering and delivery services that allows a customer to place an order for delivery by telephone or online either through a mobile application or Internet website and uses a low-speed electric bicycle or low-speed electric scooter to deliver the food. Low-speed electric bicycle means the same as the term is defined in R.S.39:1-1. Low-speed electric scooter means the same as the term is defined in R.S.39:1-1. 2.    a.  The New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission shall develop an informational pamphlet concerning the operation of low-speed electric bicycles and low-speed electric scooters. b.    The pamphlet shall, at a minimum, include: (1)   1information on the1 current laws and regulations concerning the operation of low-speed electric bicycles and low-speed electric scooters, including, but not limited to, the provisions of section 2 of P.L.2019, c.121 (C.39:4-14.16) 1and P.L.2025, c.285 (C.39:6A-4.8 et al.)1; (2)   1information on the1 penalties for failure to abide by the current laws and regulations concerning the operation of low-speed electric bicycles and low-speed electric scooters; and (3)   a notice stating that all food delivery companies operating within this State are required to distribute the pamphlet to all individuals who deliver food on behalf of the food delivery company by means of a low-speed electric bicycle or low-speed electric scooter. c.     The commission shall update the pamphlet annually to reflect any updated laws and regulations concerning the operation of low-speed electric bicycles and low-speed electric scooters. d.    The commission shall publish the pamphlet on its Internet website and include a translation of the pamphlet from English to at least five languages, including Spanish. 3.    a.  The New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission shall distribute two copies of the pamphlet developed pursuant to section 2 of P.L.    , c.     (C.       ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) to any food delivery company operating within this State within 60 days of developing the pamphlet. b.    The commission shall 1[send]1 annually 1send1 an updated pamphlet to any food delivery company operating within this State. c.     (1) Any food delivery company operating within this State shall distribute a copy of the pamphlet to all individuals who deliver food on behalf of the food delivery company by means of a low-speed electric bicycle or low-speed electric scooter within 30 days of receiving the informational pamphlet from the commission. (2)   During the 1[hiring] application1 process, a food delivery company shall include a copy of the pamphlet in any paperwork provided to a person who applies 1[for employment with] to1 the food delivery company to deliver food by means of a low-speed electric bicycle or low-speed electric scooter. 4.    This act shall take effect on the 1[first] 90th1 day 1[of the second month]1 after enactment.